Nebraska, session 109, LB597.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB597 LB597
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-1006, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1006 (1) The For school fiscal year 2023-24 and each school
fiscal year thereafter, the department shall determine the foundation aid
to be paid to each school district in accordance with subsection (2) of
this section.
(2)(a) Through school fiscal year 2024-25, the (2) The foundation
aid to be paid to each school district in each school fiscal year shall
equal one thousand five hundred dollars multiplied by the number of
formula students for such school district.
(b) For school fiscal year 2025-26 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, the foundation aid to be paid to each school district in each
school fiscal year shall equal the greater of:
(i) One thousand five hundred dollars multiplied by the number of
formula students for such school district; or
(ii) Seven and one-half percent of the basic funding calculated
pursuant to section 79-1007.16 for such school district.
(3) Twenty-four percent of the total amount of foundation aid paid
each school fiscal year shall be paid from money appropriated from the
Education Future Fund.
(4) For school fiscal years 2023-24 and 2024-25, one hundred percent
of foundation aid shall be included as a formula resource pursuant to
section 79-1017.01. For school fiscal year 2025-26 and each school fiscal
year thereafter, sixty percent of foundation aid shall be included as a
formula resource pursuant to section 79-1017.01.
Sec. 2. Section 79-1015.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1015.01 (1) Local system formula resources shall include local
effort rate yield which shall be computed as prescribed in this section.
(2) Beginning with school fiscal year 2025-26 and for each school
fiscal year thereafter: (a) For state aid certified pursuant to section
-2-

LB597 LB597
2025 2025
79-1022, the local effort rate shall be the maximum levy, for the school
fiscal year for which aid is being certified, authorized pursuant to
subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-3442 less ten cents; (b) for the final
calculation of state aid pursuant to section 79-1065, the local effort
rate shall be the rate which, when multiplied by the total adjusted
valuation of all taxable property in local systems receiving equalization
aid pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act,
will produce the amount needed to support the total formula need of such
local systems when added to state aid appropriated by the Legislature and
other actual receipts of local systems described in section 79-1018.01;
and (c) the local effort rate yield for such school fiscal years shall be
determined by multiplying each local system's total adjusted valuation by
the local effort rate.
(3) Through school fiscal year 2024-25, for (2) For each school
fiscal year except school fiscal years 2017-18 and 2018-19: (a) For state
aid certified pursuant to section 79-1022, the local effort rate shall be
the maximum levy, for the school fiscal year for which aid is being
certified, authorized pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-3442
less five cents; (b) for the final calculation of state aid pursuant to
section 79-1065, the local effort rate shall be the rate which, when
multiplied by the total adjusted valuation of all taxable property in
local systems receiving equalization aid pursuant to the Tax Equity and
Educational Opportunities Support Act, will produce the amount needed to
support the total formula need of such local systems when added to state
aid appropriated by the Legislature and other actual receipts of local
systems described in section 79-1018.01; and (c) the local effort rate
yield for such school fiscal years shall be determined by multiplying
each local system's total adjusted valuation by the local effort rate.
(4) (3) For school fiscal years 2017-18 and 2018-19: (a) For state
aid certified pursuant to section 79-1022, the local effort rate shall be
the maximum levy, for the school fiscal year for which aid is being
-3-

LB597 LB597
2025 2025
certified, authorized pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-3442
less two and ninety-seven hundredths cents; (b) for the final calculation
of state aid pursuant to section 79-1065, the local effort rate shall be
the rate which, when multiplied by the total adjusted valuation of all
taxable property in local systems receiving equalization aid pursuant to
the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act, will produce
the amount needed to support the total formula need of such local systems
when added to state aid appropriated by the Legislature and other actual
receipts of local systems described in section 79-1018.01; and (c) the
local effort rate yield for such school fiscal years shall be determined
by multiplying each local system's total adjusted valuation by the local
effort rate.
Sec. 3. Section 79-1016, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1016 (1) On or before August 20, the county assessor shall
certify to the Property Tax Administrator the total taxable value by
school district in the county for the current assessment year on forms
prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. The county assessor may amend the
filing for changes made to the taxable valuation of the school district
in the county if corrections or errors on the original certification are
discovered. Amendments shall be certified to the Property Tax
Administrator on or before August 31.
(2) On or before October 10, the Property Tax Administrator shall
compute and certify to the State Department of Education the adjusted
valuation for the current assessment year for each class of property in
each school district and each local system. The adjusted valuation of
property for each school district and each local system, for purposes of
determining state aid pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act, shall reflect as nearly as possible state aid
value as defined in subsection (3) of this section. The Property Tax
Administrator shall notify each school district and each local system of
-4-

LB597 LB597
2025 2025
its adjusted valuation for the current assessment year by class of
property on or before October 10. Establishment of the adjusted valuation
shall be based on the taxable value certified by the county assessor for
each school district in the county adjusted by the determination of the
level of value for each school district from an analysis of the
comprehensive assessment ratio study or other studies developed by the
Property Tax Administrator, in compliance with professionally accepted
mass appraisal techniques, as required by section 77-1327. The Tax
Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations setting
forth standards for the determination of level of value for state aid
purposes.
(3) For purposes of this section, state aid value means:
(a) For real property other than agricultural and horticultural
land, ninety-six percent of actual value;
(b) For agricultural and horticultural land: ,
(i) For the adjusted valuation used for the calculation of aid for
school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2025-26, seventy-two
percent of actual value as provided in sections 77-1359 and to 77-1363.
(ii) For the adjusted valuation used for the calculation of aid for
school fiscal year 2025-26 and each school fiscal year thereafter, sixty-
five percent of actual value as provided in section 77-1359 and 77-1363;
(c) For agricultural and horticultural land that receives special
valuation pursuant to section 77-1344: ,
(i) For the adjusted valuation used for the calculation of aid for
school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2025-26, seventy-two
percent of special valuation as defined in section 77-1343; and
(ii) For the adjusted valuation used for the calculation of aid for
school fiscal year 2025-26 and each school fiscal year thereafter, sixty-
five percent of special valuation as defined in section 77-1343; and
(d) (c) For personal property, the net book value as defined in
section 77-120.
-5-

LB597 LB597
2025 2025
(4) On or before November 10, any local system may file with the Tax
Commissioner written objections to the adjusted valuations prepared by
the Property Tax Administrator, stating the reasons why such adjusted
valuations are not the valuations required by subsection (3) of this
section. The Tax Commissioner shall fix a time for a hearing. Either
party shall be permitted to introduce any evidence in reference thereto.
On or before January 1, the Tax Commissioner shall enter a written order
modifying or declining to modify, in whole or in part, the adjusted
valuations and shall certify the order to the State Department of
Education. Modification by the Tax Commissioner shall be based upon the
evidence introduced at hearing and shall not be limited to the
modification requested in the written objections or at hearing. A copy of
the written order shall be mailed to the local system within seven days
after the date of the order. The written order of the Tax Commissioner
may be appealed within thirty days after the date of the order to the Tax
Equalization and Review Commission in accordance with section 77-5013.
(5) On or before November 10, any local system or county official
may file with the Tax Commissioner a written request for a nonappealable
correction of the adjusted valuation due to clerical error as defined in
section 77-128 or, for agricultural and horticultural land, assessed
value changes by reason of land qualified or disqualified for special use
valuation pursuant to sections 77-1343 to 77-1347.01. On or before the
following January 1, the Tax Commissioner shall approve or deny the
request and, if approved, certify the corrected adjusted valuations
resulting from such action to the State Department of Education.
(6) On or before May 31 of the year following the certification of
adjusted valuation pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, any local
system or county official may file with the Tax Commissioner a written
request for a nonappealable correction of the adjusted valuation due to
changes to the tax list that change the assessed value of taxable
property. Upon the filing of the written request, the Tax Commissioner
-6-

LB597 LB597
2025 2025
shall require the county assessor to recertify the taxable valuation by
school district in the county on forms prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner. The recertified valuation shall be the valuation that was
certified on the tax list, pursuant to section 77-1613, increased or
decreased by changes to the tax list that change the assessed value of
taxable property in the school district in the county in the prior
assessment year. On or before the following July 31, the Tax Commissioner
shall approve or deny the request and, if approved, certify the corrected
adjusted valuations resulting from such action to the State Department of
Education.
(7) No injunction shall be granted restraining the distribution of
state aid based upon the adjusted valuations pursuant to this section.
(8) A school district whose state aid is to be calculated pursuant
to subsection (5) of this section and whose state aid payment is
postponed as a result of failure to calculate state aid pursuant to such
subsection may apply to the state board for lump-sum payment of such
postponed state aid. Such application may be for any amount up to one
hundred percent of the postponed state aid. The state board may grant the
entire amount applied for or any portion of such amount. The state board
shall notify the Director of Administrative Services of the amount of
funds to be paid in a lump sum and the reduced amount of the monthly
payments. The Director of Administrative Services shall, at the time of
the next state aid payment made pursuant to section 79-1022, draw a
warrant for the lump-sum amount from appropriated funds and forward such
warrant to the district.
Sec. 4. Section 79-1022, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1022 (1) On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine the amounts to
be distributed to each local system for the ensuing school fiscal year
pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act and
-7-

LB597 LB597
2025 2025
shall certify the amounts to the Director of Administrative Services, the
Auditor of Public Accounts, and each local system. On or before June 15,
2025 2023, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the
department shall report the necessary funding level for the ensuing
school fiscal year to the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature, and the Education Committee of the Legislature. The report
submitted to the committees of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
certified state aid amounts, including adjustments pursuant to section
79-1065.02, shall be shown as budgeted non-property-tax receipts and
deducted prior to calculating the property tax request in the local
system's general fund budget statement as provided to the Auditor of
Public Accounts pursuant to section 79-1024.
(2) Except as provided in this subsection, subsection (8) of section
79-1016, and sections 79-1005, 79-1033, and 79-1065.02, the amounts
certified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed
in ten as nearly as possible equal payments on the last business day of
each month beginning in September of each ensuing school fiscal year and
ending in June of the following year, except that when a local system is
to receive a monthly payment of less than one thousand dollars, such
payment shall be one lump-sum payment on the last business day of
December during the ensuing school fiscal year.
Sec. 5. Section 79-1022.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1022.02 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
certification of state aid pursuant to section 79-1022, certification of
budget authority pursuant to section 79-1023, and certification of
applicable allowable reserve percentages pursuant to section 79-1027
completed prior to the effective date of this act June 1, 2023, for
school fiscal year 2025-26 2023-24 are null and void.
Sec. 6. Section 79-1023, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-8-

LB597 LB597
2025 2025
amended to read:
79-1023 (1) On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine and certify to
each school district budget authority for the general fund budget of
expenditures for the ensuing school fiscal year.
(2) Except as provided in sections 79-1028.01, 79-1029, 79-1030, and
81-829.51, each school district shall have budget authority for the
general fund budget of expenditures equal to the greater of (a) the
general fund budget of expenditures for the immediately preceding school
fiscal year minus exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section
79-1028.01 for such school fiscal year with the difference increased by
the basic allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which
budget authority is being calculated, (b) the general fund budget of
expenditures for the immediately preceding school fiscal year minus
exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section 79-1028.01 for such
school fiscal year with the difference increased by an amount equal to
any student growth adjustment calculated for the school fiscal year for
which budget authority is being calculated, or (c) one hundred ten
percent of formula need for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated minus the special education budget of
expenditures as filed on the school district budget statement on or
before September 30 for the immediately preceding school fiscal year,
which special education budget of expenditures is increased by the basic
allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated.
(3) For any school fiscal year for which the budget authority for
the general fund budget of expenditures for a school district is based on
a student growth adjustment, the budget authority for the general fund
budget of expenditures for such school district shall be adjusted in
future years to reflect any student growth adjustment corrections related
to such student growth adjustment.
-9-

LB597 LB597
2025 2025
Sec. 7. Section 79-1027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1027 No district shall adopt a budget, which includes total
requirements of depreciation funds, necessary employee benefit fund cash
reserves, and necessary general fund cash reserves, exceeding the
applicable allowable reserve percentages of total general fund budget of
expenditures as specified in the schedule set forth in this section.
Average daily Allowable
membership of reserve
district percentage
0 - 471 45
471.01 - 3,044 35
3,044.01 - 10,000 25
10,000.01 and over 20
On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March 1 each year
thereafter, the department shall determine and certify each district's
applicable allowable reserve percentage for the ensuing school fiscal
year.
Each district with combined necessary general fund cash reserves,
total requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit
fund cash reserves less than the applicable allowable reserve percentage
specified in this section may, notwithstanding the district's applicable
allowable growth rate, increase its necessary general fund cash reserves
such that the total necessary general fund cash reserves, total
requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit fund
cash reserves do not exceed such applicable allowable reserve percentage.
Sec. 8. Section 79-1031.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1031.01 The Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall
annually include the amount necessary to fund the state aid that will be
certified to school districts on or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or
-10-

LB597 LB597
2025 2025
before March 1 of each year thereafter for each ensuing school fiscal
year in its recommendations to the Legislature to carry out the
requirements of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
Sec. 9. Original sections 79-1006, 79-1015.01, 79-1016, 79-1022,
79-1022.02, 79-1023, 79-1027, and 79-1031.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 10. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-11-